Oklahoma, session 2025, SB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.24, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.24


FIREARM REGULATION – STATE PREEMPTION


A. 1. The State Legislature hereby occupies and preempts the


entire field of legislation in this state touching in any way


firearms, air powered pistols, air powered rifles, knives, firearm


and ammunition components, ammunition and supplies to the complete


exclusion of any order, policy, ordinance or regulation by any

Req. No. 1336 Page 1


municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of this state.


Any existing or future orders, policies, ordinances or regulations


in this field, except as provided for in paragraph 2 of this


subsection and subsection C of this section, are null and void.


2. A municipality may adopt any ordinance:


a. relating to the discharge of firearms within the


jurisdiction of the municipality,


b. allowing the municipality to issue a traffic citation


for transporting a firearm improperly as provided for


in Section 1289.13A of this title, provided, however,


that penalties contained for violation of any


ordinance enacted pursuant to the provisions of this


subparagraph shall not exceed the penalties


established in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, and


c. allowing the municipality to issue a citation to an


individual or the parent or guardian of a minor who


discharges an air powered pistol or air powered rifle


in an intentional or negligent manner which causes the


projectile to leave the intended premises.


3. As provided in the preemption provisions of this section,


the otherwise lawful carrying or possession of a firearm under the


provisions of Chapter 53 of this title shall not be punishable by


any municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of this



Req. No. 1336 Page 2


state as disorderly conduct, disturbing the peace or similar offense


against public order.


4. A public or private school may create a policy regulating


the possession of knives on school property or in any school bus or


vehicle used by the school for purposes of transportation.


B. No municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of


this state shall adopt any order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or


regulation concerning in any way the sale, purchase, purchase delay,


transfer, ownership, use, keeping, possession, carrying, bearing,


transportation, licensing, permit, registration, taxation other than


sales and compensating use taxes or other controls on firearms,


knives, firearm and ammunition components, ammunition and supplies.


C. Except as hereinafter provided, this section shall not


prohibit any order, policy, ordinance or regulation by any


municipality concerning the confiscation of property used in


violation of the ordinances of the municipality as provided for in


Section 28-121 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Provided,


however, no municipal ordinance relating to transporting a firearm


or knife improperly may include a provision for confiscation of


property.


D. When a person’s rights pursuant to the protection of the


preemption provisions of this section have been violated by any


order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation promulgated or


enforced by any person, municipality, agency, or other political

Req. No. 1336 Page 3


subdivision of this state, the person so violated shall have the


right to bring a civil action against the persons person, government


employee if the government employee was acting beyond the scope of


employment, municipality, and agency, or political subdivision


jointly and severally for injunctive relief or monetary damages or


both.


E. A court may require the person, municipality, agency, or


political subdivision to pay reasonable expenses to the aggrieved


party in a civil action filed pursuant to the provisions of


subsection D of this section if:


1. The aggrieved party first provides written notice of the


unlawful order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation by


certified, first-class mail or service of process to the clerk of


the municipality or to the designated agent of the municipality,


agency, or political subdivision and allows the person,


municipality, agency, or political subdivision ninety (90) days to


rescind, repeal, or otherwise abrogate the order, policy, ordinance,


resolution, or regulation; and


2. A court rules in favor of the aggrieved person whose rights


were violated and the issue in controversy is governed by previously


settled law.


If the person, municipality, agency, or political subdivision


fails to rescind, repeal, or otherwise abrogate the unlawful order,


policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation within ninety (90) days

Req. No. 1336 Page 4


of the required notice, as provided in paragraph 1 of this


subsection and the order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or


regulation is subsequently rescinded, repealed, or otherwise


abrogated after the aggrieved party files suit, the aggrieved party


shall retain standing in the suit and may recover damages or


reasonable expenses.


F. As used in this section, air powered pistol:


1. “Air-powered pistol” or air powered rifle “air-powered


rifle” is any pistol or rifle that uses compressed air or other


compressed gas to project plastic BB-like or pellet-like projectiles


at a speed not exceeding 400 feet per second; and


2. “Reasonable expenses” includes, but is not limited to,


attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court costs.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1336 CN 1/19/2025 5:38:42 AM

















Req. No. 1336 Page 5